Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-6,282
Violation; penalty; enforcement.

(1) A person violating any provision of subsection (1), (2), or (4) of section 60-6,279 shall be guilty of an infraction as defined in section 29-431 and shall be fined two hundred fifty dollars for each violation.

(2) Enforcement of subsection (1), (2), or (4) of section 60-6,279 shall be accomplished only as a secondary action when an operator of a motorcycle or moped has been cited or charged with a violation or some other offense unless the violation involves a person under the age of eighteen years riding on any portion of the motorcycle or moped not designed or intended for the use of passengers when the motorcycle or moped is in motion.

Laws 1988, LB 428, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,214;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 378;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 47;

Laws 2024, LB1004, § 2.